cs: Děti a kojenci > Učení na nočník: Nočníky; Sady k učení na nočník; Toaletní sedátka a stupátka
bg-BG: Бебета и малки деца > Приучаване към гърне: Гърнета; Комплекти за приучаване към гърне; Тоалетни седалки и столчета за стъпване
de: Baby & Kleinkind > Töpfchentraining: Töpfchen; Töpfchentrainingsets; Toilettensitze und Tritthocker
hr-HR: Bebe i mala djeca > Odvikavanje od pelena: Kahlice; Setovi za odvikavanje od pelena; WC daske i klupice za noge
ro-RO: Bebeluși și copii mici > Antrenamentul la oliță: Olițe; Seturi pentru antrenament la oliță; Scaune și taburete pentru toaletă
it: Bebè e bimbi > Addestramento al vasino: Vasini; Kit di addestramento al vasino; Sedili WC e sgabelli
sl-SI: Dojenčki in malčki > Učenje uporabe kahlice: Kahlice; Kompleti za učenje uporabe kahlice; Straniščne deske in stopničke
fi: Vauvat ja leikki-ikäiset > Pottaharjoittelu: Potat; Pottaharjoittelupakkaukset; WC-istuimet ja -askelmat
th: ทารกและเด็กเล็ก > ฝึกเด็กนั่งกระโถน: กระโถน; อุปกรณ์เสริมฝึกหัดเด็กนั่งกระโถน; ที่นั่งชักโครกและเก้าอี้บันได
sk-SK: Bábätká > Tréning na nočník: Nočníky; Súprava tréningu na nočník; Toaletné sedadlá a schodíky
pt-BR: Infantil > Desfralde: Penicos; Kits de desfralde; Assentos sanitários e bancos com degraus
zh-CN: 婴幼儿用品 > 如厕训练器: 幼儿便盆; 如厕训练器套装; 马桶座圈和踏脚凳
ja: ベビー用品 > トイレトレーニング: おまる; トイレトレーニング用品; 便座・踏み台
sv: Baby och småbarn > Potträning: Pottor; Kit för potträning; Toalettsitsar och trappallar
pl: Dzieci i niemowlęta > Trening czystości: Nocniki; Zestawy do treningu czystości; Nakładki na deski sedesowe i stołki ze stopniem
zh-TW: 嬰幼兒 > 大小便訓練: 嬰幼兒便盆; 大小便訓練用具組; 馬桶座圈和腳凳
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Ürünleri > Tuvalet Eğitimi: Lazımlıklar; Tuvalet Eğitim Setleri; Klozet Koltukları ve Basamaklı Tabureler
ru: Товары для детей > Приучение к горшку: Горшки; Наборы для приучения к горшку; Сиденья для унитаза и стульчики-подставки
fr: Bébés et tout-petits > Apprentissage de la propreté: Pots; Kits d’apprentissage de la propreté; Sièges de toilettes et escabeaux
en: Baby & Toddler > Potty Training: Potties; Potty Training Kits; Toilet Seats & Step Stools
vi: Trẻ sơ sinh và trẻ tập đi > Dạy bé ngồi bô: Bô; Bộ dụng cụ dạy bé ngồi bô; Ghế ngồi bô & ghế đẩu
nb: Baby og barn > Pottetrening: Potter; Sett for pottetrening; Toalettseter og trinnkrakker
hu: Baba- és csecsemő > Biliképzés: Bilik; Biliképző-készletek; WC-ülőkék és lépcsőfokok
es: Bebés y niños pequeños > Control de esfínteres: Orinales; Kits para el control de esfínteres; Asientos de inodoro y taburetes
pt-PT: Bebé e criança > Treino do penico: Penicos; Kits de treino de penico; Assentos sanitários e bancos com degraus
ko: 영유아 > 배변 훈련: 유아용 변기; 배변 훈련 키트; 유아용 변기 시트/발판
da: Baby og småbørn > Pottetræning: Potter; Pottetræningssæt; Toiletsæder og trappestole
lt-LT: Kūdikiai ir maži vaikai > Pratinimas prie puoduko: Puodukai; Pratinimo prie puoduko rinkiniai; Klozetų sėdynės ir laiptinės kėdės
el: Βρεφικά & παιδικά είδη > Εκπαίδευση με χρήση γιογιό: Γιογιό; Σετ εκπαίδευσης χρήσης γιογιό; Καθίσματα & σκαλοπατάκι τουαλέτας
nl: Baby en peuter > Zindelijkheidstraining: Potjes; Kits voor zindelijkheidstraining; Toiletbrillen en trapjes